Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.230

Milk dealer license—Fees—Additional assessment for late renewal.

(1) Application for each milk dealer's license shall be accompanied by an annual license fee to be established by the director by rule.

(2) If an application for the renewal of a milk dealer's license is not filed on or before the first day of an annual licensing period a late fee of up to one-half of the license fee shall be assessed and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the renewal license shall be issued: PROVIDED, That such additional assessment shall not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit that the applicant has not acted as a milk dealer subsequent to the expiration of his or her prior license.

[ 1991 c 239 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 23.]